Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.902

Implementation.

The director or the director's designee may take such steps as are necessary to ensure that chapter 287, Laws of 2003 is implemented on October 1, 2003. In particular, the director or the director's designee shall conduct outreach to small businesses and immigrant communities to enhance awareness of and compliance with state and federal laws governing money transmission and currency exchange, and to provide technical assistance in applying for a license under this chapter and understanding the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2003 c 287 s 38.]